Hawaii statutes.
§667-27 Public notice of
public sale; contents; distribution; publication. (a) The
foreclosing mortgagee shall prepare the public notice of the public sale. The
public notice shall state:

(1) The date, time, and place of
the public sale;

(2) The unpaid balance of the
moneys owed to the mortgagee under the mortgage agreement;

(3) A description of the mortgaged
property, including the address and the tax map key number of the mortgaged
property;

(4) The name of the mortgagor and
the borrower;

(5) The name of the foreclosing
mortgagee;

(6) The
name of any prior or junior creditors having a recorded lien on the mortgaged
property before the recordation of the notice of default and intention to
foreclose under section 667-23;

(7) The name, the address in the
State, and the telephone number in the State of the person in the State
conducting the public sale; and

(8) The terms and conditions of the
public sale.

(b) The public notice shall
also contain wording substantially similar to the following in all capital
letters:

"THE DEFAULT UNDER THE
MORTGAGE AGREEMENT MAY BE CURED NO LATER THAN THREE BUSINESS DAYS BEFORE THE
DATE OF THE PUBLIC SALE OF THE MORTGAGED PROPERTY BY PAYING THE ENTIRE AMOUNT
WHICH WOULD BE OWED TO THE FORECLOSING MORTGAGEE IF THE PAYMENTS UNDER THE
MORTGAGE AGREEMENT HAD NOT BEEN ACCELERATED, PLUS THE FORECLOSING MORTGAGEE'S
ATTORNEY'S FEES AND COSTS, AND ALL OTHER FEES AND COSTS INCURRED BY THE
FORECLOSING MORTGAGEE RELATED TO THE DEFAULT, UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED TO
BETWEEN THE FORECLOSING MORTGAGEE AND THE BORROWER. THERE IS NO RIGHT TO CURE
THE DEFAULT OR ANY RIGHT OF REDEMPTION AFTER THAT TIME. IF THE DEFAULT IS SO
CURED, THE PUBLIC SALE SHALL BE CANCELED."

(c) If the default is not
cured as required by the notice of default and intention to foreclose, the
foreclosing mortgagee shall have a copy of the public notice of the public sale
of the mortgaged property:

(1) Mailed or delivered to the
mortgagor and the borrower at their respective last known addresses;

(2) Mailed or delivered to any
prior or junior creditors having a recorded lien on the mortgaged property
before the recordation of the notice of default and intention to foreclose
under section 667-23;

(3) Mailed or delivered to the
state director of taxation;

(4) Mailed or delivered to the
director of finance of the county where the mortgaged property is located;

(5) Posted on the mortgaged
property or on such other real property of which the mortgaged property is a
part; and

(6) Mailed or delivered to any
other person entitled to receive notice under section 667-5.5 or 667-21.5.

(d) The foreclosing
mortgagee shall have the public notice of the public sale:

(1) Printed in not less than
seven-point font and published in the classified section of a newspaper
that is published at least weekly and having a general
circulation in the county in which the mortgaged property is located. The public notice shall be published once each week for three
consecutive weeks, constituting three publications. The public sale shall take
place no sooner than fourteen days after the date of the publication of the
third public notice advertisement; or

(2) Not less than twenty-eight days before the date
of the public sale, published on a state website at the discretion of the
agency that maintains the website; provided that:

(A) If the mortgaged property is owned by an
owner-occupant, the public notice shall be published on a website maintained by
the department. The department shall publish the public notice pursuant to
this subparagraph upon satisfaction of the filing requirements of section
667-76(b); and

(B) The public notice shall be published at
least once in the format described in paragraph (1) at least fourteen days
prior to the public sale. [L 1998, c 122, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 48, §26; am L
2012, c 182, §§20, 64, 69(5)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next